Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.140

Powers and duties of department.

The powers and duties of the department, in addition to the powers and duties provided under other sections of this chapter, are as follows:

(1) To provide space necessary to carry out the examination set forth in RCW 18.35.070 of applicants for hearing aid specialist licenses or audiology licenses.

(2) To authorize all disbursements necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(3) To require the periodic examination of testing equipment, as defined by the board, and to carry out the periodic inspection of facilities or establishments of persons who are licensed under this chapter, as reasonably required within the discretion of the department.

(4) To appoint advisory committees as necessary.

(5) To keep a record of proceedings under this chapter and a register of all persons licensed or holding interim permits under this chapter. The register shall show the name of every living licensee or interim permit holder for hearing aid specialist, every living licensee or interim permit holder for speech-language pathology, and every living licensee or interim permit holder for audiology, with his or her last known place of residence and the date and number of his or her license or interim permit.

[ 2014 c 189 s 11; 2002 c 310 s 14; 1998 c 142 s 10; 1996 c 200 s 18; 1993 c 313 s 5; 1983 c 39 s 11; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 14.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.